Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1928.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 18 O.S. 2021, Section 803, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 120, O.S.L. 2024 (18 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 803), is amended to read as follows:
Section 803. A. As used in the Professional Entity Act, unless
the context clearly indicates that a different meaning is intended:
1. "Associated act" means the Oklahoma General Corporation Act,
in the case of a corporation; the Uniform Limited Partnership Act of
2010, in the case of a limited partnership; or the Oklahoma Limited
Liability Company Act, in the case of a limited liability company;
Req. No. 12274 Page 1

2. "Interest" means a share of stock in a corporation, a
partnership interest in a limited partnership or a membership
interest in a limited liability company;
3. "Owner" means a shareholder in the case of a corporation, a
general or limited partner in the case of a limited partnership or a
member in the case of a limited liability company;
4. "Manager" means a director or officer in the case of a
corporation, a general partner in the case of a limited partnership
or a manager in the case of a limited liability company;
5. "Professional entity" means a domestic or qualified foreign
corporation, limited partnership or limited liability company formed
for the purpose of rendering professional service or formed for the
purpose of owning a professional entity rendering professional
service;
6. "Professional service" means the personal service rendered
by:
a. a physician, surgeon or doctor of medicine pursuant to
a license under Sections 481 through 524 of Title 59
of the Oklahoma Statutes, and any subsequent laws
regulating the practice of medicine,
b. an osteopathic physician or surgeon pursuant to a
license under Sections 620 through 645 of Title 59 of
the Oklahoma Statutes, and any subsequent laws
regulating the practice of osteopathy,
Req. No. 12274 Page 2

c. a chiropractic physician pursuant to a license under
Sections 161.1 through 161.20 of Title 59 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, and any subsequent laws regulating
the practice of chiropractic,
d. a podiatric physician pursuant to a license under
Sections 135.1 through 160.2 of Title 59 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, and any subsequent laws regulating
the practice of podiatric medicine,
e. an optometrist pursuant to a license under Sections
581 through 606 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
and any subsequent laws regulating the practice of
optometry,
f. a veterinarian pursuant to a license under Sections
698.1 through 698.30b of Title 59 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and any subsequent laws regulating the
practice of veterinary medicine,
g. an architect pursuant to a license under Sections 46.1
through 46.41 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
and any subsequent laws regulating the practice of
architecture,
h. an attorney pursuant to his or her authority to
practice law granted by the Supreme Court of this
state,

Req. No. 12274 Page 3

i. a dentist pursuant to a license under Sections 328.1
through 328.53 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
and any subsequent laws regulating the practice of
dentistry,
j. a certified public accountant or a public accountant
pursuant to his or her authority to practice
accounting under Sections 15.1 through 15.38 of Title
59 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and any subsequent laws
regulating the practice of public accountancy,
k. a psychologist pursuant to a license under Sections
1351 through 1376 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and any subsequent laws regulating the
practice of psychology,
l. a physical therapist pursuant to a license under
Sections 887.1 through 887.18 of Title 59 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, and any subsequent laws regulating
the practice of physical therapy,
m. a registered nurse pursuant to a license under
Sections 567.1 through 567.19 of Title 59 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, and any other subsequent laws
regulating the practice of nursing,
n. a professional engineer pursuant to a license under
Sections 475.1 through 475.22a of Title 59 of the

Req. No. 12274 Page 4

Oklahoma Statutes, and any subsequent laws relating to
the practice of engineering,
o. a land surveyor pursuant to a license under Sections
475.1 through 475.22a of Title 59 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and any subsequent laws relating to the
practice of land surveying,
p. an occupational therapist pursuant to Sections 888.1
through 888.15 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes
and any subsequent law regulating the practice of
occupational therapy,
q. a speech pathologist or speech therapist pursuant to
Sections 1601 through 1622 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and any subsequent law regulating the
practice of speech pathology,
r. an audiologist pursuant to Sections 1601 through 1622
of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and any
subsequent law regulating the practice of audiology,
s. a registered pharmacist pursuant to Sections 353
through 360 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and
any subsequent law regulating the practice of
pharmacy,
t. a licensed perfusionist pursuant to Sections 2051
through 2071 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and

Req. No. 12274 Page 5

any subsequent laws regulating the practice of
perfusionists,
u. a licensed professional counselor pursuant to Sections
1901 through 1920 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and any subsequent law regulating the
practice of professional counseling,
v. a licensed marital and family therapist pursuant to
Sections 1925.1 through 1925.18 of Title 59 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, and any subsequent law regulating
the practice of marital and family therapy,
w. a dietitian licensed pursuant to Sections 1721 through
1739 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes and any
subsequent laws regulating the practice of dietitians,
x. a social worker licensed pursuant to Sections 1250
through 1273 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and
any subsequent laws regulating the practice of social
work,
y. a licensed alcohol and drug counselor pursuant to
Sections 1870 through 1885 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and any subsequent laws regulating the
practice of alcohol and drug counseling,
z. a licensed behavioral practitioner pursuant to
Sections 1930 through 1949.1 of Title 59 of the

Req. No. 12274 Page 6

Oklahoma Statutes, and any subsequent laws regulating
the practice of behavioral health services, or
aa. a certified real estate appraiser licensed pursuant to
Sections 858-700 through 858-732 of Title 59 of the
Oklahoma Statutes or listed on the National Registry
of Appraisers by the Appraisal Subcommittee in
compliance with Title XI of the Financial Institutions
Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act (FIRREA) of
1989, and any subsequent laws regulating the practice
of real estate appraisal, or
bb. a human resource professional defined as someone who
works in the human resources department of an
organization, managing the employee life cycle and
performing tasks including recruiting, hiring,
training, and administering benefits;
7. "Related professional services" means those services which
are combined for professional entity purposes as follows:
a. any combination of the following professionals:
(1) a physician, surgeon or doctor of medicine
pursuant to a license under Sections 481 through
524 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and any
subsequent laws regulating the practice of
medicine,

Req. No. 12274 Page 7

(2) an osteopathic physician or surgeon pursuant to a
license under Sections 620 through 645 of Title
59 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and any subsequent
laws relating to the practice of osteopathy,
(3) a dentist pursuant to a license under Sections
328.1 through 328.53 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and any subsequent laws regulating the
practice of dentistry,
(4) a chiropractic physician pursuant to a license
under Sections 161.1 through 161.20 of Title 59
of the Oklahoma Statutes, and any subsequent laws
regulating the practice of chiropractic,
(5) a psychologist pursuant to a license under
Sections 1351 through 1376 of Title 59 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, and any subsequent laws
regulating the practice of psychology,
(6) an optometrist pursuant to a license under
Sections 581 through 606 of Title 59 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, and any subsequent laws
regulating the practice of optometry,
(7) a podiatric physician pursuant to a license under
Sections 135.1 through 160.2 of Title 59 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, and any subsequent laws
regulating the practice of podiatric medicine,
Req. No. 12274 Page 8

(8) a dietitian licensed pursuant to Sections 1721
through 1739 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes
and subsequent laws regulating the practice of
dietitians, or
(9) an occupational therapist pursuant to Sections
888.1 through 888.15 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma
Statutes and any subsequent law regulating the
practice of occupational therapy, or
b. any combination of the following professions:
(1) an architect pursuant to a license under Sections
46.1 through 46.41 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and any subsequent laws regulating the
practice of architecture,
(2) a professional engineer pursuant to a license
under Sections 475.1 through 475.22a of Title 59
of the Oklahoma Statutes, and any subsequent laws
relating to the practice of engineering, or
(3) a land surveyor pursuant to a license under
Sections 475.1 through 475.22a of Title 59 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, and any subsequent laws
relating to the practice of land surveying;
8. "Regulating board" means the board which is charged with the
licensing and regulation of the practice of the profession which the
professional entity is organized to render;
Req. No. 12274 Page 9

9. "Individual", "incorporator" and "shareholder" each include
the trustee of an express trust created by a person duly licensed or
otherwise permitted to render a professional service who has the
right to revoke the trust and who is serving as the trustee of the
trust. Any certificate required by the Professional Entity Act to
be issued to an individual incorporator or shareholder may be issued
to the grantor on behalf of a trust. All references in the
Professional Entity Act to death and incapacity of a shareholder
shall include the death and incapacity of the grantor of a trust
which own stock in a professional corporation;
10. "Incapacity" of a shareholder means a determination by a
court of competent jurisdiction, or otherwise by two independent
licensed physicians, that the shareholder is fully incapacitated or
is partially incapacitated to the extent that the shareholder is not
capable of rendering the professional service for which the
professional corporation was organized; and
11. "Other personal representative" includes the successor
trustee of an express trust owning stock in a professional
corporation, which trust was created by a person duly licensed or
otherwise permitted to render the professional service for which the
professional corporation was organized who has the right to revoke
the trust and who is the original trustee of the trust.


Req. No. 12274 Page 10

B. The definitions of the applicable associated act shall apply
to the Professional Entity Act, unless the context clearly indicates
that a different meaning is intended.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12274 MJ 01/29/25


















Req. No. 12274 Page 11